Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5048HV (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 2628 Section 1. Section 321.194, subsection 7, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. As a result of the suspension, the department shall 3 not issue an intermediate license under section 321.180B , 4 subsection 2, for an additional three months to a person 5 whose special minorâs restricted license was suspended 6 under this subsection , per violation, following the personâs 7 sixteenth birthday. However, during the suspension period, 8 the department may issue an instruction permit under section 9 321.180B, subsection 1, if the person whose special minorâs 10 restricted license was suspended applies for an instruction 11 permit, is otherwise eligible to be issued an instruction 12 permit, and pays the required fee. 13 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies on and after 14 March 1, 2027, or the publication date of the issue of the 15 Iowa administrative bulletin that includes a statement 16 by the director of transportation that the department of 17 transportationâs new driverâs license information technology 18 system is implemented, whichever is earlier. The department 19 shall forward a copy of the statement to the Iowa Code editor 20 prior to publication. 21